Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1303
Buyer in the ordinary course of business, defined.

Buyer in the ordinary course of business shall mean a person who, in the ordinary course of business, buys farm products from a person engaged in farming operations who is in the business of selling farm products.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 3.